Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.901

Construction—Sections decodified and added to this chapter.

The sections decodified by RCW 9A.44.900 and added to Title 9A RCW as a new chapter with the designation chapter 9A.44 RCW shall be construed as part of Title 9A RCW.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 244 s 18.]